California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9300. - 9308.]

9300.

Upon default in payment of any installment of a reassessment, or interest or penalties thereon, the lands securing the reassessments shall be sold in the same manner in which real property in the city is sold for the nonpayment of general taxes, and shall be subject to redemption within one year from date of sale in the same manner as such real property is redeemed from such delinquent sale, and upon failure of such redemption shall in like manner pass to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.

In the event of default in the payment of any installment of any reassessment upon tax-deeded land or default in the payment of interest thereon, the land may be sold under this division as in the case of other lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

The city shall be the purchaser at any delinquent sale in like manner in which it becomes or may become the purchaser of property sold for nonpayment of the general property tax, and shall pay and transfer into the redemption fund the amount of the delinquent reassessment and of the delinquent interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

If the municipal property tax is collected by county officials and sales for nonpayment of such taxes are made to the State, the State shall be the purchaser at any delinquency sale held pursuant to this division. However, the State shall hold the title acquired at such sale upon behalf of the city and shall account to the city for any money received upon redemption or from the sale of such property. The city, for the purposes of this division, shall be deemed the real purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

As to all lands of which any city is deemed the real purchaser under the provisions of this article, such city and all of the officials thereof shall have all of the rights, powers, duties, and obligations granted, authorized, or imposed by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

If any succeeding installment of the reassessment on property purchased by a city at a delinquency sale or interest thereon is not paid in any future year, the property shall not be sold unless there has previously been a redemption from such sale or unless under the law it is then being sold for delinquent taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

The city shall, unless a resale has been made by it, from time to time, when due pay and transfer into the redemption fund the amount of any future delinquent reassessment and interest pending redemption. No redemption shall be made until any such subsequent payments, with interest and penalties, shall also be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

In the event of sale by the tax collector of any lot or parcel of land for nonpayment of taxes and of any installment of the reassessment thereon, or of the penalties, interest, or costs thereon, or for nonpayment of any installment, penalties, interest, or costs, then any certificate of sale or any deed issued is primary evidence of the regularity of all proceedings theretofore had, and shall be conclusive evidence of all things of which bonds issued upon the security thereof are conclusive evidence, and prima facie evidence of the regularity of all proceedings subsequent to the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9308.

A deed issued under this chapter conveys to the grantee the absolute title to the lands described therein, free of all encumbrances, except unpaid installments, interest, and penalties under the same proceeding and except taxes and public improvement assessments which by law are equal or prior to the reassessment on which sale is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure When Funds Not Available for Payment [9315. - 9318.]

9315.

If there are no available funds in the treasury of the city or county with which to pay sums due on property bought at delinquency sales, the tax collector shall delay the entry of the certificate of sale until such funds are available, making demand in the meantime upon the legislative body that a suitable amount be included in the next tax levy for the purpose of providing funds with which to make such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9316.

The delay in execution of a certificate of sale to a city or to the State referred to in the next preceding section shall not extend the period of redemption from the tax sale; nor shall the rights or privileges of the property owner be thereby affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9317.

The legislative body may, and in the event of demand by the tax collector therefor as provided in Section 9315 shall, at the time of fixing the annual tax rate and levying the taxes to be collected for general municipal purposes, levy a special tax upon the taxable property in the city for the purpose of paying for the lands purchased or to be purchased at delinquency sales held pursuant to this division, or for the purpose of paying installments of the reassessment or of interest which the city is required to pay, but not to exceed for each district, the bonds of which are refunded, ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessable property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9318.

The special tax provided for in this chapter shall be in addition to all other taxes and shall be computed, entered, and collected in the same manner and by the same persons and at the same time and with the same penalties and interest as are other taxes of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Foreclosure of Reassessment Lien [9350. - 9362.]

9350.

In the event of nonpayment of any reassessment or installment thereof or of any interest thereon, together with any penalties and other charges accruing under the laws or ordinances of the city and not later than four years after the due date of the last installment of principal, as a cumulative remedy, such amounts when due and delinquent may by order of the legislative body be collected by an action brought in the superior court to foreclose the lien thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9351.

The lien of a reassessment on tax-deeded land may be foreclosed as in case of other lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

The action shall be brought in the name of the city and may be brought at any time prior to the expiration of four years subsequent to the date of delinquency of the last installment of reassessment due or to become due thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9353.

The complaint may be brief and include substantially only the following allegations with reference to the reassessments sought to be collected:

(a) That on a date stated the legislative body passed its resolution or ordinance determining to refund certain bonds which had been issued for certain improvement work (the improvement work need not be described).

(b) That a reassessment for the purpose of refunding the bonds was duly given and made.

(c) That the reassessment was recorded on a stated date.

(d) That certain property (describing it) was therein reassessed a stated amount.

(e) That bonds upon the security of such reassessment were duly issued, giving the date of the bonds, the interest rate, and the number of years the last installment thereof was to run, and that the bonds were duly issued, but it shall be unnecessary to state the amount, number, denomination, or other term thereof. 

(f) That on a date stated a certain sum came due on the property on the reassessment and had not been paid and that the legislative body had directed the action to foreclose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9354.

The costs of the action shall be fixed and allowed by the court and shall include a reasonable attorney’s fee, interest, penalties, and other charges and advances as provided in this division, and when so fixed and allowed by the court shall be included in the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9355.

The amount of penalties, costs and interest due shall be calculated up to the date of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9356.

The court may adjudge and decree a lien against the lot or parcel of land covered by the reassessment for the amount of the judgment and may order the premises to be sold on execution as in other cases of the sale of real estate by the process of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 174.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

9357.

On appeal, the appellate courts shall have the same power to adjudge and decree a lien and order such premises to be sold on execution as is provided in this chapter for the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9358.

The foreclosure action shall be governed and regulated by the provisions of this chapter, and also where not in conflict herewith by the codes of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9359.

Upon the ordering of any of the foreclosure actions the tax collector shall be credited upon the assessment roll then in his hands with the amount charged against him on account of reassessments ordered to suit and shall be relieved of further duty in regard thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9360.

In any action to foreclose the lien of a reassessment, any refunding bond shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity and validity of the reassessment proceedings and of the reassessment and of the refunding bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9361.

A city shall have the right to advance and pay county or other taxes wherever necessary to protect its interest in property against which there is a delinquent reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9362.

Any foreclosure of a reassessment lien shall convey the property to the purchaser free and clear of all encumbrances except such taxes and special assessment liens as are by law equal or superior to said reassessment lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Issuance of Refunding Bonds [9400. - 9417.]

9400.

The legislative body shall provide for the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9401.

In no event shall refunding bonds be issued for more than the par value of the outstanding bonds and the due and unpaid interest coupons to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

The refunding bonds shall represent and be secured by said reassessments and any later reassessments which may be levied or issued upon the same property in lieu of said assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this division shall comply with the following requirements:

(a) Bonds shall be in such denominations as the legislative body may determine.

(b) Bonds shall be payable to bearer.

(c) The date of the bonds shall be the date of the recording of the reassessment.

(d) Bonds shall be signed by the mayor or other chief executive of the city and by the city treasurer, and attested by the city
 clerk, the seal of the city affixed thereto.

(e) Bonds shall be numbered consecutively and shall bear interest and mature as provided in the contract with the bondholders.

(f) The coupons affixed to the bonds shall be signed by the city treasurer by his printed, lithographed, or engraved facsimile signature.

(g) At least the first two maturing interest coupons on the bonds must be at a rate of interest less than the interest rate on the bonds to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

All of the refunding bonds shall mature on July 2d.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

In no event shall the first maturity of any refunding bonds be earlier than the second day of July next succeeding 10 months after the date of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9406.

The last maturity of any refunding bonds shall not exceed 19 years from the second day of July next succeeding 10 months after the date of said bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9407.

The rate of interest on refunding bonds shall not exceed the rate of interest on the outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9408.

The interest on refunding bonds shall be payable on January 2d and July 2d, respectively, of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9409.

The first interest payment on such bonds shall in every case be January 2d next preceding the second day of July next succeeding 10 months after the date of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9410.

Refunding bonds and the interest thereon shall be paid at the office of the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9411.

Refunding bonds may be issued in substantially the following form: United States of AmericaState of CaliforniaNo. City of $Refunding Improvement Bond
Under and by virtue of an act of the Legislature of the State of California, designated as “Refunding Act of 1935 for 1915 Improvement Act Bonds,” the ____ of the State of California, will, on the second day of July, 19__, out of the redemption fund for the payment of the bonds issued upon the reassessments made for the work upon and improvements on certain streets (or on ____ street, or in improvement district No. ____, or on certain rights of way owned by, or by other suitable description, or for the laying out, opening, extending, widening,
 straightening or acquiring of certain streets) more fully described in that certain resolution, or ordinance of intention passed by the city council (or other board) of the municipality on the ____ day of ____, 19__, pay to bearer the sum of ____ ($_____) with interest thereon from the ____ day of ____, 19__, to the ____ day of ____, 19__ at the rate of __ percent per annum, and thereafter at the rate of __ percent (__%) per annum, payable semiannually on the second days of January and July of each year upon presentation of the proper interest coupons therefor, both principal and interest payable at the office of the treasurer of the aforesaid ____.This bond is one of an issue of refunding bonds of like date and effect issued under the above-mentioned act for the purpose of refunding the bonds issued under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 for the purpose of
 providing means for paying for the work and improvements described in the resolution (or ordinance) of intention and is secured by the moneys in the redemption fund and by the unpaid reassessments made for the payment of the work, and, including principal and interest, is payable exclusively out of the redemption fund.This bond will continue to bear interest after maturity at the rate above stated, provided it is presented at maturity or within 10 days thereafter and payment thereof is refused upon the sole ground that there is not sufficient money in the redemption fund to pay it. If it is not so presented, interest thereon will run until maturity.This bond may be redeemed and paid in advance of maturity upon the second day of January or July in any year by giving the notice provided in the
 refunding bond act.It is hereby certified, recited, and declared that all proceedings, acts, and things required by law precedent to or in the issuance of this bond have been regularly had, done, and performed and this bond is by law made conclusive evidence thereof.In witness whereof, ____ has caused this bond to be signed by the mayor (or other chief executive) and the treasurer of ____ and by its clerk and has caused its clerk to affix thereto its corporate seal, all on the ____ day of ____, 19__.
Mayor.Treasurer.Attest:City Clerk.(seal)

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9412.

Each bond shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings for the issuance of refunding bonds and of the validity of said bonds and of all proceedings of which the bonds refunded were conclusive evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9413.

The refunding bonds shall be delivered to the holders of the outstanding bonds in accordance with the contract with such bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9414.

When the refunding bonds have been exchanged for the outstanding bonds, the outstanding bonds, except as to any sum payable from assessments which property owners have by written notice elected to pay, shall be canceled by the city treasurer and shall be filed in the office of the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9415.

If the city has appropriated money to assist in the refunding, such money shall be paid to the holders of outstanding bonds in accordance with the contract with the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9416.

The validity of any refunding bonds issued under this division shall not be contested in any action, suit or proceeding unless such action or proceeding shall have been brought within three months after the issuance of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9417.

The treasurer shall keep a register in his office which shall show the series, number, date, amount, rate of interest, and last known holder of each bond and the number and amount of each interest coupon paid by him. He shall cancel and file each bond and coupon paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Advance Retirement of Bonds [9450. - 9456.]

9450.

Whenever there is in the redemption fund two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more available for the payment of principal of bonds, and not collected for the purpose of paying the principal of bonds maturing on the next second day of July, the city shall purchase or call bonds as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9451.

The treasurer shall, by notice published once not less than 30 days prior to the date designated in some financial journal having a national circulation, invite sealed proposals for the sale of any of the refunding bonds to the city. The notice shall state the amount available for the purchase of such bonds and shall specify the time and place when proposals will be opened. The treasurer shall also, at least 10 days prior to the date so designated, mail a copy of the invitation for sealed proposals to any bondholder who has theretofore in writing requested such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9452.

The proposals for the sale of bonds shall be opened in public at the time and place specified in the notice. The legislative body in its discretion may reject any or all of the proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9453.

If no proposals are received at a price of less than par and accrued interest, or if an insufficient amount of bonds are tendered at less than par and accrued interest to exhaust, as nearly as possible, the money available for purchase of bonds, the treasurer shall set aside a sum sufficient to pay the principal and accrued interest to the next interest payment date of the bonds to be called for redemption and shall proceed to call for redemption, in numerical order, at par and accrued interest to the next interest payment date, such outstanding bonds as can be retired from said funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9454.

Notice of the calling of bonds for redemption shall be given by publication once in a financial journal having a national circulation, unless the holders of the bonds to be called, in writing, waive such notice. The date of publication of notice shall be not less than 30 days prior to the date so fixed for redemption. Interest on the bonds so called shall cease upon the redemption date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9455.

All refunding bonds so purchased or redeemed pursuant to call shall be canceled by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9456.

All costs of publication provided for in this chapter shall be payable from the redemption fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Validating Proceedings [9475. - 9481.]

9475.

After the reassessment has been confirmed it shall not be contested in any way other than at the time and in the manner specified in this chapter, and in any such action all findings, conclusions, and determinations of the legislative body which conducted the reassessment proceedings shall be conclusive in the absence of actual fraud.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9476.

No defect in the form of any reassessment levied pursuant to this division and no statutory defect in any of the proceedings relating to the reassessment and refunding shall in any way invalidate any reassessment or any refunding bond.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9477.

No bond, coupon, assessment, or installment thereof or of the interest or penalties thereon, and no certificate of sale or deed shall be held invalid for error in the computation of the proper amount due on it if the error be found to be comparatively negligible or be found to be in favor of the owner of real property affected thereby.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9478.

An action to determine the validity of a reassessment and of any refunding bonds issued or to be issued thereon may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For such purpose the reassessment shall be deemed to be in existence upon its confirmation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9479.

If any reassessment or any refunding bond is held illegal or invalid in any action or proceeding upon any ground which would apply to the entire reassessment or the entire issue of refunding bonds, then the unpaid bonds refunded remain in full force and effect. If the unpaid bonds have been canceled the treasurer of the city which conducted the invalid refunding or reassessment proceedings shall issue new bonds of the same tenor, force, and effect as the canceled unpaid bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9480.

If refunding bonds are invalidated or held to be illegal, all of the provisions of the act under which the original bonds were issued shall apply to the original bonds and to any bonds issued under Section 9479 to replace such original bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------

9481.

No action or proceeding to set aside, cancel, avoid, annul, or correct any reassessment levied under this division, or to review any of the proceedings, acts, or determinations made in the proceedings for the reassessment and the issuance of refunding bonds, or to question the validity of or enjoin the collection of the reassessment or any of the reassessments therein, or to enjoin the issuance of any bonds to represent reassessments, shall be maintained by any person, nor shall any person urge, plead, or prove the invalidity of any reassessment or any refunding bond in any action, unless such action shall have been commenced within the time provided for by Chapter 9 of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1525.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11.5. REFUNDING ACT OF 1984 FOR 1915 IMPROVEMENT ACT BONDS [9500. - 9707.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [9500. - 9519.5.]

9500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “Refunding Act of 1984 for 1915 Improvement Act Bonds.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.

The procedures of this division are an alternative to Division 11 (commencing with Section 9000) which relates to the refunding of bonds under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

It is hereby declared that it is a public purpose for a local agency to issue refunding bonds for the purposes set forth in this division and to invest and reinvest the proceeds thereof, and any other funds legally available therefor, for the purposes set forth herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

The legislative body of any city in this state may issue refunding bonds and refund outstanding bonds issued either under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500)) or under this division, under and subject to this division, and may provide for the extension of the liens of assessments and the levy and collection of assessments and reassessments to pay the refunding bonds. All or any portion of any bond issue authorized for refunding by this section may be refunded pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

9504.

It is the intention of this division that the outstanding bonds and the original assessments shall remain in full force and effect and secured by the original assessments until superseded and supplanted by reassessments and refunding bonds validly and legally issued pursuant to this division, at which time the reassessments shall become the security for the refunding bonds and the refunding escrow shall become the security for any outstanding bonds not exchanged for refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

Any action or determination made necessary by reason of state or federal constitutional requirements or otherwise, or any action or determination which is convenient in the making of the reassessment, or in the refunding and reassessment proceedings, which is not expressly set forth in this division is hereby authorized and the same when made shall be valid and sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

Any city may retain or employ any qualified person to perform any work or perform any services provided for or authorized by this division or in connection with the refunding of any indebtedness authorized to be refunded under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9507.

The incidental expenses of any refunding and reassessment authorized by this division, including the designated costs of issuing the refunding bonds, as defined and determined pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9600), may be paid from the proceeds of sale of the refunding bonds or from contributions and appropriations made pursuant to Section 9510.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9508.

Subject to Section 9509, when proceedings are commenced under this division, only this division shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9509.

A reassessment proceeding under this division may be conducted concurrently with proceedings under any other applicable reassessment law and all resolutions, notices, reports, and other documents and proceedings required by each law may be consolidated into single instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9510.

Contributions and appropriations may be made at the times and in the manner provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 9125) of Chapter 3 of Division 11, the terms of which are hereby referred to and incorporated herein by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9511.

This division does not affect any other act or acts now existing or which may hereafter be passed covering the same subject matter, nor apply to any proceedings thereunder, but is intended to and does provide an alternative system for the refunding of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9512.

The remedies provided for the enforcement of any reassessment levied under the provisions of this division are not exclusive and additional remedies may be provided at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

The curative clauses of this division are cumulative and each of them is to be given full force and effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9514.

This division and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed in order that its purposes may be made effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9515.

In the event of a foreclosure or action to quiet title, process shall be served upon the same person or persons as in other cases of suits against the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9516.

The purchaser, whether at a tax collector’s sale or at a resale by the city in the event of the city having become the purchaser, or at a foreclosure sale by order of court, takes the property subject to all unpaid reassessment installments, interest, and penalties under the same proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9517.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 shall govern the construction of this division.

The term “act,” as used in this division, means the Improvement Bond Act of 1915.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9518.

Any surplus remaining in the improvement fund for the assessment district, after completion of the improvements and the payment of all claims, may be used as a credit upon the reassessment in the manner provided in Section 10427.1 or as otherwise provided in Section 10427.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 12.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9519.

Any balance remaining in the special reserve fund for the bonds to be refunded at the time of the issuance of the refunding bonds shall be used to retire the bonds to be refunded as provided in Section 8885.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 13.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9519.5.

Sections 8571.3 and 8769 are applicable to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Reassessment Proceedings [9520. - 9548.]

9520.

Except as it may otherwise have determined pursuant to Section 8571.3, the legislative body of any city which has issued bonds which are outstanding under the act may, at any time, determine by resolution that the public interest or necessity requires the refunding of the issue of bonds, and declare its intention to refund the bonds and to levy reassessments as security for the refunding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 14.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9521.

Two or more issues of bonds issued under the act may be refunded in one proceeding under this division and only one issue of refunding bonds issued therefor, to be secured by all of the reassessments levied in lieu of the original assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9522.

The proceedings for refunding two or more issues of bonds shall follow as nearly as may be the procedure for the refunding of one issue, with the modifications and changes in the resolutions, notices, reassessment list, bonds, auditor’s report, summons, complaints, and all other proceedings as may be necessary or convenient in carrying through the proceedings, and the legislative body conducting the proceedings is hereby granted full jurisdiction, power, and authority to refund two or more issues of bonds issued under the act in one proceeding under this division and with only one issue of refunding bonds secured by all of the reassessments and to perform all acts, take all steps and proceedings, provide all notices, and do all acts and things necessary or convenient for the refunding that are not prohibited by the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9523.

The resolution referred to in Section 9520 shall direct a qualified person retained or employed pursuant to Section 9506 to prepare and file with the city clerk a report containing the following:

(a) A schedule setting forth the unpaid principal and interest on the bonds to be refunded and the total amounts thereof.

(b) The total estimated principal amount of the reassessment and of the refunding bonds and the maximum interest rate thereon, together with an estimate of cost of the reassessment and of issuing the refunding bonds, including all costs of issuing the refunding bonds, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 9600.

(c) The auditor’s record kept pursuant to Section 8682 showing the schedule of principal installments and interest on all unpaid original assessments and the total amounts thereof.

(d) The estimated amount of each reassessment, identified by reassessment number corresponding to the reassessment number on the reassessment diagram, together with a proposed auditor’s record for the reassessment prepared in the manner described in Section 8682.

(e) A reassessment diagram showing the assessment district and the boundaries and dimensions of the subdivisions of land within the district. Each subdivision, including each separate condominium interest as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, shall be given a separate number upon the diagram.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9524.

When the report provided for in Section 9523 is filed with the clerk, the clerk shall present it to the legislative body for consideration. The legislative body may modify it in any respect. The report as modified shall stand as the report for the purpose of all subsequent proceedings, except that it may be confirmed, modified, or corrected as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9525.

(a) If the legislative body finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied, it may approve and confirm the report prepared pursuant to Section 9523 and proceed to authorize, issue, and sell refunding bonds pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9600):

(1) That each estimated annual installment of principal and interest on the reassessment, as set forth pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 9523, is less than the corresponding annual installment of principal and interest on the portion of the original assessment being superseded and supplanted, as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 9523, by the same percentage for all subdivisions of land within the district. Any amount added to the annual installments on the reassessment due to a delinquency in payment on the original assessment need not be considered in this calculation.

(2) That the number of years to maturity of all refunding bonds is not more than the number of years to the last maturity of the bonds being refunded.

(3) That the principal amount of the reassessment on each subdivision of land within the district is less than the unpaid principal amount of the portion of the original assessment being superseded and supplanted by the same percentage for each subdivision of land within the district. Any amount added to a reassessment because of a delinquency in payment on the original assessment need not be considered in this calculation.

(b) Any reassessment that is approved and confirmed pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be an assessment within the meaning of, and may be ordered without compliance with the procedural requirements of, Article XIIID of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 38, Sec. 7.   Effective July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9526.
